North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-06.1 Disposition of Traffic Offenses
39-06.1-10.
Entries against driving record — Director duties — Hearings — Demerit schedule — Suspension.

If a report of a conviction of a traffic offense, or admission or adjudication of a traffic violation is received by the director, the director shall proceed to enter the proper points on the licensee’s driving record, unless the points assigned to the violation are two or less. If the points assigned to the violation are two or less, the violation and points may not be entered on the driving record but must be recorded separately, and the separate record is not available to the public. Points from a violation in which the points are two or less are considered a part of the driving record for the sole purpose of point reduction under section 39-06.1-13 and for purposes of license suspension. If the driving record shows that the licensee has accumulated a total of twelve or more points, assigned on the basis of the schedule contained in subsection 3, the director shall notify the licensee of the director’s intention to suspend the operator’s license under section 39-06-33. For the purposes of this chapter, the director also may receive and act on reports of traffic offense convictions forwarded by federal, military, and tribal courts in this state.

If the director confirms, after hearing or opportunity for hearing, that the licensee’s driving record has an accumulated point total of twelve or more points, the director shall suspend the licensee’s operator’s license according to the following schedule:

Points must be assigned and accumulated on the basis of the following schedule:

Noncriminal Violations

Criminal Violations

If the director is informed by a court that an individual has been convicted of violating section 39-08-01, or equivalent ordinance, the director, subject to the offender’s opportunity for hearing under subsection 1, shall suspend that individual’s operator’s license until the offender furnishes to the director the written statement of the counselor or instructor of an appropriate licensed addiction treatment program that the offender does not require either an education or treatment program or that the offender has physically attended the prescribed program and has complied with the attendance rules. The director shall send notice to the offender informing the offender of the provisions of this subsection.

If within the seven years preceding the most recent violation of section 39-08-01, or equivalent ordinance, the offender has previously violated section 39-08-01, or equivalent ordinance, at least three times, the driving privileges must be suspended and may be restored only after the offender has completed addiction treatment through an appropriate licensed addiction treatment program and has had no alcohol-related or drug-related offense for two consecutive years after completion of treatment. The offender must receive a temporary restricted license during the suspension period, in accordance with section 39-06.1-11.

If judicial disposition of a traffic violation includes an order or recommendation of suspension or revocation of an operator’s license, the suspension or revocation runs concurrently with any suspension ordered under this section. After a conviction of an individual for violating section 39-08-01, the director, in suspending the individual’s operator’s license, shall give credit for the time in which license suspension or revocation has been or is being imposed under chapter 39-20 in connection with the same offense.

A suspension must be deemed to have commenced twenty days after the order of suspension is delivered to the licensee at the licensee’s address of record in the department. Constructive delivery under this section must be considered as occurring seventy-two hours after proper deposit in the mails.

Points assigned under this section must be recorded against an operator’s driving record regardless of whether the operator has ever had an operator’s license issued in this state, and the director shall maintain records on all violators regardless of licensure. Upon the assignment of twelve or more points, any unlicensed operator must be deemed to be driving under suspension if the operator has never had an operator’s license or if the operator has failed to renew the operator’s license.

The period of suspension imposed for a violation of section 39-08-01, 39-08-01.2, or 39-08-01.4 or equivalent ordinance is:

Ninety-one days if the operator’s record shows the individual has not violated section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance within the seven years preceding the last violation.

One hundred eighty days if the operator’s record shows the individual has not violated section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance within the seven years preceding the last violation and the violation was for an alcohol concentration of at least eighteen one-hundredths of one percent by weight.

Three hundred sixty-five days if the operator’s record shows the individual has once violated section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance within the seven years preceding the last violation.

Two years if the operator’s record shows the individual has at least once violated section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance within the seven years preceding the last violation and the violation was for an alcohol concentration of at least eighteen one-hundredths of one percent by weight.

Two years if the operator’s record shows the individual has at least twice violated section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance within the seven years preceding the last violation.

Three years if the operator’s record shows the individual has at least twice violated section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance within the seven years preceding the last violation and the violation is for an alcohol concentration of at least eighteen one-hundredths of one percent by weight.

If an individual has a temporary restricted driver’s license with the restriction the individual participates in the twenty-four seven sobriety program under chapter 54-12, the individual may operate a motor vehicle during the suspension periods under this section.

Accumulated Point Total: Period of Suspension: a. Twelve 7 days b. Thirteen and above 7 days for each point over eleven

Click to view

Noncriminal Adjudicationor Admission of: PointsAssigned: (1) Overtime and double parking in violation of city ordinances 0 points (2) Failure to display license plates 1 point (3) Permitting unauthorized minor to drive 2 points (4) Permitting unauthorized individual to drive 2 points (5) Unlawful stopping, standing, or parking on open highway in violation of section 39-10-47 2 points (6) Unlawful parking in prohibited place 1 point (7) Leaving motor vehicle improperly unattended on an open highway 1 point (8) Opening or leaving motor vehicle doors open when unsafe to do so 1 point (9) Except as provided in and , knowingly driving with defective, nonexistent, or unlawful equipment in violation of , or equivalent ordinances sections 39-21-44 39-21-45.1 section 39-21-46 2 points (10) Careless driving in violation of , or equivalent ordinance section 39-09-01 6 points (11) Violating or exceeding restrictions contained in a restricted certificate issued under section 39-06.1-03 4 points (12) Racing or drag racing motor vehicles in violation of , or equivalent ordinance section 39-08-03.1 10 points (13) Exhibition driving in violation of , or equivalent ordinance section 39-08-03.1 3 points (14) Failing to yield right of way in violation of , through , , , , or , or equivalent ordinances section 39-10-20 39-10-22 39-10-26 39-10-28 39-10-33.3 39-10-44 39-10-72 2 points (15) Disobeying an official traffic-control device in violation of , , or , or equivalent ordinances section 39-10-04 39-10-05 39-10-07 2 points (16) Driving on wrong side of road in violation of , , or , or equivalent ordinances section 39-10-08 39-10-14 39-10-16 2 points (17) Failing to dim headlights in violation of , or equivalent ordinance section 39-21-21 1 point (18) Failing to stop at railroad crossing in violation of or , or equivalent ordinances section 39-10-41 39-10-42 3 points (19) Knowingly driving with defective brakes in violation of or , or equivalent ordinances section 39-21-32 39-21-33 2 points (20) Disregarding the lawful commands of a police officer in violation of , or equivalent ordinance section 39-10-02 2 points (21) Overtaking where prohibited or in an unsafe manner in violation of , , , or , or equivalent ordinances section 39-10-11 39-10-12 39-10-13 39-10-15 2 points (22) Overtaking and passing a schoolbus in violation of , or equivalent ordinance section 39-10-46 6 points (23) Operating a motor vehicle without a license in violation of , or equivalent ordinance section 39-06-01 4 points (24) Improperly operating or unlawfully carrying passengers or packages on a motorcycle in violation of , or equivalent ordinance section 39-10.2-02 2 points (25) Improperly operating a motorcycle in laned traffic in violation of , or equivalent ordinance section 39-10.2-03 2 points (26) Clinging to other vehicles while riding a motorcycle in violation of , or equivalent ordinance section 39-10.2-04 4 points (27) Carrying a passenger on a motorcycle not equipped with passenger footrests in violation of , or equivalent ordinance section 39-10.2-05 2 points (28) Operating a motorcycle without protective headgear in violation of subsection 1 of , or equivalent ordinance section 39-10.2-06 2 points (29) Failing to use the care required in , or equivalent ordinance section 39-09-01.1 2 points (30) Except as provided in paragraph 33, operating a motor vehicle in excess of speed limit in violation of , or equivalent ordinance section 39-09-02

6 - 10 mph over limit 0 points 11 - 15 mph over limit 1 point 16 - 20 mph over limit 3 points 21 - 25 mph over limit 5 points 26 - 35 mph over limit 9 points 36 - 45 mph over limit 12 points 46 + mph over limit 15 points (31) Driving in violation of section 39-08-18 2 points (32) Driving in violation of section 39-08-09 6 points (33) On a highway on which the speed limit is posted in excess of sixty-five miles [104.61 kilometers] an hour, operating a motor vehicle in excess of the speed limit in violation of , or equivalent ordinance section 39-09-02 Miles per hour overlawful speed limit Points

1 - 5 0

6 - 10 1 11 - 15 3 16 - 20 5 21 - 25 7 26 - 30 10 31 - 35 12 36 + 15 (34) Failing to have a minor in a child restraint system or seatbelt in violation of section 39-21-41.2 1 point (35) Failure or refusal to comply with rules of the superintendent of the highway patrol in violation of subsection 3 of section 39-21-46 0 points (36) Violation of or any rule adopted under that section section 39-21-44 2 points (37) Except as provided in paragraph 39, operating a motor vehicle without liability insurance, in violation of section 39-08-20 6 points (38) Except as provided in paragraph 39, operating a motor vehicle without liability insurance, in violation of , if the driving record shows that the licensee has within the eighteen months preceding the violation previously violated section 39-08-20 section 39-08-20 12 points (39) Operating a motor vehicle without liability insurance, in violation of , if the violation was discovered as the result of investigation of an accident in which the driver is the owner section 39-08-20 14 points (40) Driving a modified motor vehicle in violation of , or equivalent ordinance section 39-21-45.1 1 point (41) Driving in violation of the conditions of an instructional permit. 2 points

Click to view

Conviction of: PointsAssigned: (1) Reckless driving in violation of , or equivalent ordinance section 39-08-03 8 points (2) Aggravated reckless driving in violation of , or equivalent ordinance section 39-08-03 12 points (3) Leaving the scene of an accident involving property damage in violation of , , or , or equivalent ordinances section 39-08-05 39-08-07 39-08-08 14 points (4) Leaving the scene of an accident involving personal injury or death in violation of , or equivalent ordinance section 39-08-04 18 points (5) Violating restrictions in a restricted license issued under and relating to the use of eyeglasses or contact lenses while driving section 39-06-17 3 points (6) Violating any restrictions other than those listed in paragraph 5, contained in a restricted license issued under or section 39-06-17 39-06.1-11 4 points (7) Except as provided in paragraph 9 of subdivision a, knowingly operating an unsafe vehicle in violation of , or equivalent ordinance section 39-21-46 2 points (8) Fleeing in a motor vehicle from a peace officer in violation of , or equivalent ordinance section 39-10-71 24 points (9) Causing an accident with an authorized emergency vehicle or a vehicle operated by or under the control of the director used for maintaining the state highway system in violation of subsection 5 of , or equivalent ordinance section 39-10-26 2 points

Click to view

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 301, § 10; 1975, ch. 339, § 14; 1975, ch. 340, § 1; 1975, ch. 341, § 3; 1977, ch. 353, § 1; 1977, ch. 354, §§ 2, 3; 1977, ch. 355, § 2; 1979, ch. 187, § 78; 1979, ch. 418, § 3; 1979, ch. 420, § 1; 1981, ch. 91, § 27; 1981, ch. 385, § 5; 1981, ch. 389, § 4; 1981, ch. 391, § 2; 1981, ch. 392, § 2; 1983, ch. 415, §§ 15, 16; 1983, ch. 432, § 2; 1985, ch. 429, § 5; 1985, ch. 430, §§ 2, 4; 1985, ch. 434, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 436, § 1; 1987, ch. 460, § 3; 1987, ch. 461, § 2; 1987, ch. 463, §§ 3, 4; 1987, ch. 464, § 2; 1987, ch. 465, § 2; 1987, ch. 466, § 2; 1987, ch. 467, §§ 1, 2; 1987, ch. 468, § 1; 1989, ch. 463, §§ 3, 4; 1991, ch. 414, §§ 2 to 4; 1991, ch. 416, § 2; 1991, ch. 417, § 1; 1993, ch. 375, § 7; 1993, ch. 386, § 1; 1995, ch. 377, § 1; 1997, ch. 337, § 2; 1999, ch. 344, § 2; 2001, ch. 341, § 5; 2003, ch. 317, § 3; 2003, ch. 318, § 3; 2003, ch. 321, § 1; 2007, ch. 325, §§ 2, 3; 2009, ch. 331, § 3; 2009, ch. 333, § 1; 2011, ch. 271, § 13; 2011, ch. 272, § 6; 2013, ch. 295, § 9; 2013, ch. 296, §§ 3–6; 2013, ch. 301, §§
4, 5; 2015, ch. 264, § 3, § 4, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 265, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 319, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 283, §§ 9, 10, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by sections 3 and 4 of chapter 264, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 39-06.1-10 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in of Chapter 283, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1502; and Section 10 of Chapter 283, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1502.

Section 39-06.1-10 was amended 2 times by the Legislative Assembly.

Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 3 of Chapter 264, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2166; and Section 4 of Chapter 264, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2166.

Section 8 of chapter 272, S.L. 2011 provides: “

APPLICATION.

This Act applies to permits and licenses issued after January 1, 2012, and does not effect a valid permit or license issued before the effective date of this Act.”

Section 6 of chapter 331, S.L. 2001, provides:

“

APPLICATION OF DEMERIT POINTS OR FEES.

The operator’s license demerit points or fees for driving in violation of section 39-09-02, or equivalent ordinance, as provided by Senate Bill No. 2088, as passed by the fifty-seventh legislative assembly, do not apply to offenses committed before July 1, 2001.”

Cross-References.

Licensing substance abuse treatment programs, see ch. 50-31.

Penalty for driving while license suspended or revoked, see §§ 39-06-42, 39-06-43.

Prior offenses under § 39-08-01 restricted to those after July 1, 1981, see § 39-08-01.1.

39-06.1-10.1.
Alternative disposition — Driver training course — Exceptions.

An individual issued a summons or notice to appear under section 39-07-07 may appear before the court and elect to attend a driver training course approved by the director in lieu of entry of points on the licensee’s driving record. An individual who elects to attend the course must so notify the court at the time of posting the bond, which is forfeited even though an election is made under this section. The individual who makes the election shall pay the driver training course fee to the driver training course sponsor. If an individual elects to attend the course, the point penalty of five points or fewer for the violation by section 39-06.1-10 may not be assessed if proof of completion of the course is presented to the department within thirty days after the individual notifies the court of the election. An individual may not make an election under this section if:

That individual has made an election under this section within the twelve months preceding the date of issuance of the summons or notice to appear;

The offense is assigned six or more points; or

The offense is an offense listed in section 39-06.1-05.

An individual making an election under this section forfeits any point reduction option under section 39-06.1-13.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 418, § 1; 2013, ch. 295, § 10.

39-06.1-11.
Temporary restricted license — Ignition interlock device.

Except as provided under subsection 2 or 3, if the director has suspended a license under section 39-06.1-10 or has extended a suspension or revocation under section 39-06-43, upon receiving written application from the offender affected, the director may for good cause issue a temporary restricted operator’s license valid for the remainder of the suspension period after seven days of the suspension period have passed.

If the director has suspended a license under chapter 39-20, or after a violation of section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance, upon written application of the offender the director may issue a temporary restricted license that takes effect after thirty days of the suspension have been served after a first offense under section 39-08-01 or chapter 39-20, but if the offender is participating in the twenty-four seven sobriety program under chapter 54-12, the director shall issue a temporary restricted license that takes effect after fourteen days of the suspension have been served if the driver is not subject to any unrelated suspension or revocation.

A temporary restricted license must be issued in accordance with subsection 7 if the offender is participating in and compliant with the twenty-four seven sobriety program under chapter 54-12 or if the offender has not committed an offense for a period of one year before the date of the filing of a written application. The application must be accompanied by:

Proof of financial responsibility and a report from an appropriate licensed addiction treatment program and, if prescribed, proof of compliance with attendance rules in an appropriate licensed addiction treatment program; or

If the offender is participating in the drug court program or other court-ordered treatment or sobriety program, a recommendation from the district court.

For a temporary restricted license under subsection 3, the director may conduct a hearing for the purposes of obtaining information, reports, and evaluations from courts, law enforcement, and citizens to determine the offender’s conduct and driving behavior during the prerequisite period of time. The director may require an ignition interlock device be installed in the offender’s vehicle and may require the applicant to submit proof of attendance at a driver training course approved by the director. The director may impose additional conditions as reasonably necessary to ensure compliance.

The director may not issue a temporary restricted license for a period of license revocation or suspension imposed under section 39-06-31. A temporary restricted license may be issued for suspensions ordered under subsection 4 of section 39-06-32 if it could have been issued had the suspension resulted from in-state conduct.

In addition to any restrictions authorized under section 39-06-17, the director may impose any of the following conditions upon the use of a temporary restricted license issued under this section for the use of a motor vehicle by the offender:

To use during the licensee’s normal working hours;

To use for attendance at an appropriate licensed addiction treatment program or a treatment program ordered by a court; or

To use as necessary to prevent the substantial deprivation of the educational, medical, or nutritional needs of the offender or an immediate family member of the offender.

Violation of a restriction imposed according to this section is deemed a violation of section 39-06-17.

This section does not limit the director’s authority to cancel a temporary restricted license for good cause.

If an offender has been charged with, or convicted of, a second or subsequent violation of section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance, or if the offender’s license is subject to suspension under chapter 39-20 and the offender’s operator’s license is not subject to an unrelated suspension or revocation, the director shall issue a temporary restricted license to the offender upon the restriction the offender participate in the twenty-four seven sobriety program under chapter 54-12. The offender shall submit an application to the director for a temporary restricted license along with submission of proof of financial responsibility and proof of participation in the twenty-four seven sobriety program to receive a temporary restricted license.

If the director denies a temporary restricted license under this section, or denies a request for a hearing under subsection 4, the applicant may appeal within thirty days after the date of the decision by filing a notice of appeal in the district court in the county where the applicant resides and by serving the notice of appeal on the director. On appeal the district court shall review the application and may authorize presentation of additional evidence.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 301, § 11; 1975, ch. 341, § 4; 1981, ch. 384, § 7; 1983, ch. 415, § 17; 1985, ch. 429, § 6; 1989, ch. 465, § 1; 1991, ch. 419, § 1; 1997, ch. 338, § 1; 2005, ch. 332, § 1; 2007, ch. 325, § 4; 2009, ch. 469, § 4; 2013, ch. 291, § 59; 2013, ch. 292, § 3; 2013, ch. 295, § 11; 2013, ch. 301, § 6; 2019, ch. 319, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

Note.

This section is set out above to reflect a correction since the 2015 cumulative supplement. In subsection (3) the reference to "subsection 5" was changed to "subsection 7".

39-06.1-12.
Completion of suspension — Reduction of point total.

If a licensee completes a period of suspension ordered under section 39-06.1-10 or as ordered or recommended by a court of competent jurisdiction, the director shall reduce the point total shown on the licensee’s driving record to eleven points. A suspension must be ordered if that licensee’s point total again reaches twelve or more points.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 301, § 12; 2013, ch. 295, § 12.

39-06.1-13.
Reduction of point total — Other methods.

The director shall reduce the point total shown on any licensee’s driving record by one point for each three-month period during which points are not recorded against the licensee’s driving record for a moving violation or a violation listed in paragraphs 12 through 16 of subdivision a of subsection 3 of section 39-06.1-10. The three-month period must be calculated from the date of entry of the last points against that licensee’s driving record.

The point total shown on a licensee’s driving record must, during any twelve-month period, be reduced by three points when the licensee mails or delivers a certificate to the director indicating successful completion of instruction in a driver training course approved by the director. Successful completion of instruction must be certified to by the sponsoring agency or organization of the driver training course. The reduction in points under this subsection must be solely from a point total accumulated before completion of the necessary hours of driver training instruction, and may not exceed nine points during any three-year period commencing on the date of entry of the last points against the individual’s driving record. If on the date the director receives the certificate of completion of the driver training course from the licensee, that licensee’s driving record contains twelve or more points or, as a minor, the licensee’s driving record contains six points or more, the point reduction under this subsection must be applied after serving the period of suspension or cancellation required by the number of points on the licensee’s record.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 301, § 13; 1975, ch. 339, § 15; 1977, ch. 347, § 5; 1981, ch. 393, § 1; 1985, ch. 429, § 7; 1987, ch. 469, § 1; 1991, ch. 420, § 1; 1993, ch. 386, § 2; 1997, ch. 332, § 8; 2001, ch. 340, § 7; 2013, ch. 295, § 13.

Cross-References.

Licensing substance abuse treatment programs, see ch. 50-31.

39-06.1-14.
Delivery of license revocation.

Delivery of the order of revocation is deemed to have occurred seventy-two hours after the order is mailed by regular mail to the address of record in the department under section 39-06-20.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 341, § 5; 1995, ch. 372, § 5; 2005, ch. 329, § 4; 2013, ch. 295, § 14; 2017, ch. 265, § 3, effective August 1, 2017.

39-06.1-15.
Diplomatic immunities and privileges.

This section applies only to an individual who displays an operator’s license issued by the United States department of state to a police officer or who otherwise claims immunities or privileges under chapter 6 of title 22 of the United States Code with respect to the individual’s violation of any law or ordinance that relates to the operation of a motor vehicle.

If a driver who is subject to this section is stopped by a police officer who has probable cause to believe that the driver has committed a violation, the police officer shall record all relevant information from any operator’s license or identification card, including an operator’s license or identification card issued by the United States department of state; as soon as practicable contact the United States department of state office in order to verify the driver’s status and immunity, if any; and forward the following to the bureau of diplomatic security office of foreign missions of the United States department of state:

A vehicle accident report, if the driver was involved in a vehicle accident;

A copy of the citation or other charging document if a citation or other charging document was issued to the driver; and

A written report of the incident if a citation or other charging document was not issued to the driver.

This section does not prohibit or limit the application of any law to a criminal or motor vehicle violation by an individual who has or claims immunities or privileges under title 22 of the United States Code.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 343, § 1; 2013, ch. 295, § 15.